test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# SMI proper nouns. Currently for lexicons ACCRA, HAWAII, VARGGAT, NYSTØ, GATA, BERN, OY, JOKULL, PIPPI, ERVASTI, MAKI, NIEMI, HANNOLA. In addition there are specific tests for o-final words going to ACCRA and NYSTØ lexicons because these have o9 to prevent o:u in illatives and comitatives

Tests:
  Propernoun - Sayonara: # ACCRA-ani
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: Sayonara 
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: Sayonara
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Acc: Sayonarav
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ine: Sayonaran
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill: Sayonaraj
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela: Sayonaras
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Com: Sayonarajn
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Nom: Sayonara
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Ine: Sayonarajn
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Ess: Sayonaran
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sayonara+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Bilde: # ACCRA-obj
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Bilde 
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Bilde
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Bildev
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Bilden
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Bildij
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Bildes
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Bildijn
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Bilde
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Bildijn
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Bilden
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Bilde+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Bilservice: # ACCRA-org
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Bilservice
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Bilservice
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Bilservicev
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Bilservicen
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Bilservicij
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Bilservices
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Bilservicijn
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Bilservice
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: Bilservicijn
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Bilservicen
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Bilservice+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Brønnøysundregistrene: # ACCRA-org
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Brønnøysundregistrene 
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Brønnøysundregistrene
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Brønnøysundregistrenev
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Brønnøysundregistrenen
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Brønnøysundregistrenij
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Brønnøysundregistrenes
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Brønnøysundregistrenijn
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Brønnøysundregistrene
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ine: Brønnøysundregistrenijn
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Brønnøysundregistrenen
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Brønnøysundregistrene+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Børge: # ACCRA-mal
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Børge 
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Børge
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Børgev
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Børgen
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Børgij
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Børges
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Børgijn
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Børge
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Børgijn
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Børgen
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Børge+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Teo: # ACCRA-mal # o-final words are o9 (prevent o:u)
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Teo 
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Teo
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Teov
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Teon
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Teoj
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Teos
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Teojn
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Teo
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Teojn
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Teon
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Teo+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Selene: # ACCRA-fem
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Selene 
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Selene
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Selenev
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Selenen
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Selenij
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Selenes
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Selenijn
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Selene
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Selenijn
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Selenen
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Selene+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Sara: # ACCRA-femsur
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Sara 
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Sara
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Sarav
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Saran
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Saraj
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Saras
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Sarajn
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Sara
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Sarajn
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Saran
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Sara 
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Sara
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Sarav
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Saran
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Saraj
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Saras
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Sarajn
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Sara
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Sarajn
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Saran
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Janne: # ACCRA-malfem
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Janne 
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Janne
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Jannev
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Jannen
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Jannij
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Jannes
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Jannijn
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Janne
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Jannijn
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Jannen
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Janne 
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Janne
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Jannev
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Jannen
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Jannij
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Jannes
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Jannijn
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Janne
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Jannijn
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Jannen
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
  Propernoun - Columbia: # ACCRA-objplc
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: Columbia 
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Columbia
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Columbiav
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Columbian
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: Columbiaj
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Columbias
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Columbiajn
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Columbia
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ine: Columbiajn
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: Columbian
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Columbia 
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Columbia
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Columbiav
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Columbian
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Columbiaj
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Columbias
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Columbiajn
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Columbia
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Columbiajn
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Columbian
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: columbialasj
    Columbia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: columbiak
    
  Propernoun - Salla: # ACCRA-femplc
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Salla 
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Salla
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Sallav
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Sallan
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Sallaj
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Sallas
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Sallajn
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Salla
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine: Sallajn
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Sallan
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Salla 
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Salla
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Sallav
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Sallan
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Sallaj
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Sallas
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Sallajn
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Salla
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Sallajn
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Sallan
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: sallalasj
    Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: sallak
    
  Propernoun - Caprino: # ACCRA-sur 
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Caprino 
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Caprino
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Caprinov
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Caprinon
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Caprinoj
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Caprinos
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Caprinojn
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Caprino
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Caprinojn
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Caprinon
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Caprino+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
     
  Propernoun - Valio: # ACCRA-malsur
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Valio 
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Valio
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Valiov
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Valion
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Valioj
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Valios
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Valiojn
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Valio
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ine: Valiojn
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Valion
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Valio 
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Valio
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Valiov
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Valion
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Valioj
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Valios
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Valiojn
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Valio
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ine: Valiojn
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Valion
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Jugoslavia: # ACCRA-plc
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Jugoslavia 
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Jugoslavia
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Jugoslaviav
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Jugoslavian
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Jugoslaviaj
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Jugoslavias
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Jugoslaviajn
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Jugoslavia
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Jugoslaviajn
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Jugoslavian
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: jugoslavialasj
    Jugoslavia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: jugoslaviak
